District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

42-302

Perpetuities — Charitable uses excepted.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1351, ch. 854, § 1023
Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-292, § 403, 48 DCR 2087
1981 Ed., § 45-302.
1973 Ed., § 45-102.